Washington statutes.
RCW 16.50.120

Humane methods for bleeding or slaughtering livestock required.

No slaughterer or packer shall bleed or slaughter any livestock except by a humane method: PROVIDED, That the director may, by administrative order, exempt a person from compliance with this chapter for a period of not to exceed six months if he or she finds that an earlier compliance would cause such person undue hardship.

[ 2011 c 336 s 422; 1967 c 31 s 3.]